Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 2. Board of Education.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, §§ 6, 12, 13.

§ 22.1-8.
General supervision vested in Board.

The general supervision of the public school system shall be vested in the Board of Education.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-11; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 203; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 4.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 425, cl. 1, provides: “§ 1. The Board of Education shall develop model criteria and procedures for establishing a jointly operated high school with a career and technical education focus to be recommended to the Governor and the General Assembly for funding as a Governor’s Career and Technical Education School.”

Acts 2018, c. 517, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Board of Education shall make recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than November 1, 2018, relating to (i) strategies for eliminating any stigma associated with high school career and technical education pathways and the choice of high school students to pursue coursework and other educational opportunities in career and technical education and related fields such as computer science and robotics and (ii) the consolidation of the standard and advanced diplomas into a single diploma and the creation of multiple endorsements for such diploma to recognize student competencies and achievements in specific subject matter areas.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Selection of textbooks. —

A local school board may select and use textbooks that are not approved by the Board of Education, provided it complies with the Board’s regulations governing such selection. Further, a local school board must give “official approval” of criteria to be used for review and assessment of textbooks at the local level. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 09-022, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (7/27/09).

§ 22.1-9.
Appointment, terms, and vacancies.

The Board of Education shall consist of nine members appointed by the Governor, at least two of whom shall represent business and industry in the private sector in the Commonwealth, and of the nine members at least five shall reside in different superintendent’s regions in the Commonwealth. The Governor shall consider appointing one member with expertise or experience in local government leadership or policymaking, one member with expertise or experience in career and technical education, and one member with expertise or experience in early childhood education. Every appointment to the Board shall be for a term of four years, except that appointments to fill vacancies other than by expiration of term shall be for the unexpired terms. All appointments, including those to fill vacancies, shall be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, and any appointment made during the recess of the General Assembly shall expire at the end of 30 days after the commencement of the next session of the General Assembly. No member of the Board shall be appointed to more than two consecutive four-year terms.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-12.1; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 203; 1980, c. 559; 2017, c. 687; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 21; 2022, c. 770.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 4.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 395, cl. 4 provides: “That, beginning July 1, 2017, the term of any member appointed to the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-9 of the Code of Virginia that is set to expire on January 29 shall be extended to June 30 of that year.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 21, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments made on and after July 1, 2021, shall be made in accordance with this act.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 687 inserted “at least two of whom shall represent business and industry in the private sector in the Commonwealth” and substituted “30” for “thirty.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, c. 21, effective July 1, 2021, added “and of the nine members at least five shall reside in different superintendent’s regions in the Commonwealth” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 770 added the second sentence.

§ 22.1-9.1.
Student Advisory Board established.

There is hereby established the Student Advisory Board (the Advisory Board) for the purpose of providing student perspectives on matters before the Board.

The Advisory Board shall consist of eight members appointed by the Governor, each of whom shall be a high school student who will enter senior year during the following school year and each of whom shall reside in a different Superintendent’s region. Each member shall serve for a term of one year, and no member is eligible to be reappointed.

The Advisory Board shall meet at least semiannually in either an in-person or, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a virtual format and shall designate at least one member to make an annual presentation to the Board that includes analysis of and recommendations on matters before the Board or any other matter that the Advisory Board deems relevant.

History.

2022, c. 778.

§ 22.1-10.
President.

The Board shall elect from its membership a president for a term of two years.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-13; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 203; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-11.
Quorum.

A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-14; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-12.
Oath of office.

Before entering upon the duties of office, a person appointed to the Board shall take and subscribe the oath prescribed for an officer of this Commonwealth as provided in Chapter 1 (§

49-1

et seq.) of Title 49.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-15; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-13.
Meetings.

Meetings of the Board shall be held upon the call of the president or upon request of a majority of its members. The president shall give due notice to all the members of the time and place of all meetings. The place of meeting shall ordinarily be the office of the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-17; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-14.
Minutes.

The minutes of each meeting of the Board shall be signed by the person presiding at such meeting.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-18; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-15.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 728.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to compensation and expenses of boards, commissions and similar bodies, see §

2.2-2813

.

§ 22.1-16.
Bylaws and regulations generally.

The Board of Education may adopt bylaws for its own government and promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to carry out its powers and duties and the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-19; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 203; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to powers and duties of Board of Education, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 5.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 72, provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Education shall review its Regulations Establishing Standards for Accrediting Public Schools in Virginia (8 VAC 20-131) as they relate to homebound instructional services to address whether homebound instruction may be made available to students who are confined at home or in a health care facility for periods that would prevent normal school attendance based upon evidence submitted by any person licensed to diagnose and treat mental, emotional, or behavioral disorders by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions.”

Acts 2010, c. 814, cl. 1, as amended by Acts 2012, cc. 805 and 836, provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Education shall amend its regulations to require that all teacher education preparation programs in early/primary preK-3, elementary education preK-6, middle education 6-8, and history and social sciences include local government and civics instruction specific to Virginia.

“§ 2. Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 805 and 836, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2012.”

Acts 2010, c. 814, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective by July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2012, c. 786, cl. 1, provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Education shall develop physical education program guidelines for public elementary and middle schools.”

Acts 2012, c. 786, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education, in developing the guidelines pursuant to this act, shall work with the American Heart Association, the American Cancer Society, the American Academy of Pediatrics, Virginia Chapter, the Virginia Association of School Superintendents, the Virginia School Boards Association and other interested stakeholders.”

Acts 2012, c. 786, cl. 3, provides: “That the Board of Education shall develop the guidelines pursuant to this act prior to January 1, 2014.”

§ 22.1-16.1.
Board to establish regulations regarding human research.

The Board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to effectuate the provisions of Chapter 5.1 (§

32.1-162.16

et seq.) of Title 32.1 for human research, as defined in §

32.1-162.16

, to be conducted or authorized by the Department of Education or any public schools including the Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind or any proprietary schools certified by the Board.
The regulations shall require the human research committee to submit to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction or his designee at least annually a report on the human research projects reviewed and approved by the committee and shall require the committee to report any significant deviations from the proposals as approved.

History.

1992, c. 603.

§ 22.1-16.2.
(Repealed) Child identification kits; child protection kits.

History.

2003, cc. 83, 86; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 22.1-16.3.
Cooperation with other state agencies regarding students placed in group homes or residential facilities having educational programs.

In addition to the requirement to cooperate with other state departments in licensing and certification of residential schools for students with disabilities, the Department of Education shall cooperate with other state departments in fulfilling their respective licensing and certification responsibilities and in reducing and simplifying the regulations involved in the licensing and certification of group homes and residential facilities for children when such homes or facilities include an educational program. The Board shall promulgate regulations allowing the Department of Education to so assist and cooperate with other state departments.

The Board’s regulations shall address the services required to be provided in such homes and facilities as it may deem appropriate to ensure the education and safety of the students. In addition, the Board’s regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to (i) specifications for the structure and accommodations of such homes or facilities according to the needs of the children to be placed; (ii) rules concerning allowable activities, local government and home- or facility-imposed curfews, and study, recreational, and bedtime hours; and (iii) a requirement that each home or facility have a community liaison who shall be responsible for facilitating cooperative relationships with the neighbors, the local school division, local law enforcement, local government officials, and the community at large.

History.

2005, cc. 358, 471.

§ 22.1-16.4.
Nutrition and physical activity best practices database.

The Department of Education shall develop and maintain a nutrition and physical activity best practices database. The database shall contain the results of any wellness-related fitness testing done by local school divisions, as well as information on successful programs and policies implemented by local school divisions designed to improve nutrition and physical activity in the public schools. This information may include (i) a description of the program or policy, (ii) advice on implementation, (iii) any assessment of the program or policy, (iv) a contact person from the local school division, and (v) any other information the Department deems appropriate. The database shall be readily accessible to all local school divisions in the Commonwealth and the Department of Health. While the Board shall encourage local school divisions to submit information to the database, no school division shall be required to submit information.

History.

2008, cc. 47, 398.

§ 22.1-16.5.
Training materials on human trafficking.

The Board, in collaboration with the Department of Social Services, shall provide awareness and training materials for local school division staff on human trafficking, including strategies for the prevention of trafficking of children.

History.

2012, cc. 317, 370.

§ 22.1-16.6.
Guidelines for alternatives to suspension.

The Board of Education shall establish guidelines for alternatives to short-term and long-term suspension for consideration by local school boards. Such alternatives may include positive behavior incentives, mediation, peer-to-peer counseling, community service, and other intervention alternatives.

History.

2017, cc. 231, 303.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 231 and 303 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-16.7.
Regulations regarding endorsement to teach military science.

The State Board of Education shall amend its regulations to require that persons seeking a technical professional license with an endorsement to teach military science have either the appropriate credentials issued by the United States military or a recommendation from a Virginia employing educational agency.

History.

2020, cc. 108, 109.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 108 and 109 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-16.8.
Instructional material; sexually explicit content; parental notification.

As used in this section, “sexually explicit content” has the same meaning as provided in subsection A of §

2.2-2827

.

The Department shall develop and make available to each school board model policies for ensuring parental notification of any instructional material that includes sexually explicit content and include information, guidance, procedures, and standards relating to:

Ensuring parental notification;

Directly identifying the specific instructional material and sexually explicit subjects; and

Permitting the parent of any student to review instructional material that includes sexually explicit content and provide, as an alternative, nonexplicit instructional material and related academic activities to any student whose parent so requests.

Each school board shall adopt policies that are consistent with but may be more comprehensive than the model policies developed by the Department pursuant to subsection B.

History.

2022, c. 100.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 100, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education shall develop and make available to each school board model policies pursuant to subsection B of
§ 22.1-16.8 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than July 31, 2022.”

Acts
2022, c. 100, cl. 3 provides: “That each school board shall adopt policies pursuant to subsection C of
§ 22.1-16.8 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than January 1, 2023.”

Acts
2022, c. 100, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed as requiring or providing for the censoring of books in public elementary and secondary schools.”

§ 22.1-17.
Statements concerning regulations.

Not less than sixty days prior to the adoption of any regulation affecting school divisions, the Board of Education and the Department of Education shall prepare a statement as to the administrative impact of such regulation on school divisions and the projected costs of implementation of and compliance with such regulation and shall send a copy thereof to each division superintendent.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-19.01; 1976, c. 602; 1980, c. 559; 1988, c. 234.

§ 22.1-17.01.
Definition of “intervener.”

For the purposes of regulations promulgated by the Board of Education, “intervener” means an individual with knowledge and skill in the mode of communication of a deaf-blind student and who can communicate to the deaf-blind student what is occurring in the student’s educational setting.

History.

2013, c. 729.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 729, cl. 1 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-17.02.
Definition of “student with limited or interrupted formal education.”

The Department shall develop and adopt a common statewide definition for the term “student with limited or interrupted formal education” and shall require local school divisions to report the number of students who fall under such definition as part of the required data collection and reporting on average daily membership for the purposes of documenting any changes in such numbers over time.

The Board shall evaluate the supports and programs available to students with limited or interrupted formal education in local school divisions to determine whether the calculations for the school quality indicators within the Board’s Regulations Establishing the Standards for Accrediting Public Schools in Virginia (8VAC20-131-5 et seq.) are appropriate or whether changes in methodology could be made to more comprehensively measure the academic and nonacademic achievement of such student population. Such evaluation shall be completed to make the necessary revisions to impact the methodology for the calculation of school accreditation ratings for the 2021-2022 school year

History.

2020, c. 696.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 696 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-17.1.
Regulations for reenrollment.

The Board of Education, in cooperation with the Board of Juvenile Justice, shall promulgate regulations for the reenrollment in the public schools of children who have been in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. Such regulations shall include the components required in a reenrollment plan and shall provide for consistency in the curricula, standards and policies between the educational programs required by this title, and those of the Board of Juvenile Justice.

History.

1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1996, c. 1000; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Cross references.

As to supervision of juvenile during commitment and on parole, see § 16.1-293.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 797, which enacted this section, in cl. 3 provided that the provisions of the 1990 act would become effective July 1, 1992. However, Acts 1991, c. 295, cl. 1 amended Acts 1990, c. 797, cl. 3, to make this section effective July 1, 1991.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and twice substituted “Board of Juvenile Justice” for “Board of Correctional Education.”

§ 22.1-17.2.
Nursing education programs.

The Board of Education and the Board of Nursing, or their representatives, shall, at least annually, develop and revise an interagency agreement relating to the regulation of public school nursing education programs.
This memorandum of understanding shall establish a framework for cooperation in order to achieve consistency in the regulation of such programs. The duties and responsibilities of the Department of Education and the Board of Nursing for public school practical nursing and nurse aide education programs shall be set forth in the agreement.
The agreement shall include, but need not be limited to, core curricula for the programs; administrative and clerical activities such as exchange of mailing labels, participation in site visits, reporting requirements, and information for newsletters; review and revision of the curricula materials; participation in inservice activities and state conferences; opportunity to participate in and comment on revisions of any relevant regulations; and communication procedures between the two state agencies and with the local school divisions.

History.

1991, c. 629.

§ 22.1-17.3.
Identification of student internship programs.

The Board of Education, the Department of Labor and Industry, and the State Board for Community Colleges shall identify High School to Work Partnerships established pursuant to subsection D of § 22.1-227.1 and other student internship programs that may be eligible for exemptions from federal and state labor laws and regulations for which exemptions are available for student apprenticeship programs. The Board of Education, the Department of Labor and Industry, and the State Board for Community Colleges shall also establish procedures by which such exemptions may be obtained for such High School to Work Partnerships and other student internship programs.

History.

1996, c. 150; 2018, cc. 142, 388.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 142 and 388 are identical, and inserted “High School to Work Partnerships established pursuant to subsection D of § 22.1-227.1 and other” in the first sentence; inserted “the Department of Labor and Industry, and the” and “such High School Work Partnerships and other” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-17.4.
Certain honorary diplomas to be issued under specific circumstances.

Any veteran of World War II may apply to the Board of Education for a Commonwealth of Virginia World War II Veteran Honorary High School Diploma by filing, in compliance with Board guidelines, a statement declaring that:

During the years between 1939 and 1945, he served in any branch of the United States Armed Forces and was subsequently honorably discharged;

He was drafted or did enlist in the United States Armed Forces while still enrolled as a secondary school student in any school in any state or territory of the United States or any school located on or associated with a United States military base or embassy; and

He was unable to resume his secondary education upon returning to civilian life.

Any veteran of the Korean War may apply to the Board of Education for a Commonwealth of Virginia Korean War Veteran Honorary High School Diploma by filing, in compliance with Board guidelines, a statement declaring that:

During the years between 1950 and 1953, he served in any branch of the United States Armed Forces and was subsequently honorably discharged;

He enlisted in or was drafted into the United States Armed Forces while still enrolled as a secondary school student in any school in any state or territory of the United States or any school located on or associated with a United States military base or embassy; and

He was unable to resume his secondary education upon returning to civilian life.

Any veteran of the Vietnam War may apply to the Board of Education for a Commonwealth of Virginia Vietnam War Veteran Honorary High School Diploma by filing, in compliance with Board guidelines, a statement declaring that:

During the years between 1959 and 1975, he served in any branch of the United States Armed Forces and was subsequently honorably discharged;

He enlisted in or was drafted into the United States Armed Forces while still enrolled as a secondary school student in any school in any state or territory of the United States or any school located on or associated with a United States military base or embassy; and

He was unable to resume his secondary education upon returning to civilian life.

The Board of Education shall establish guidelines setting forth the timelines and procedures for applying for such diplomas. Upon the filing of the required statement in accordance with its guidelines, the Board of Education shall award the veteran either a Commonwealth of Virginia World War II Veteran Honorary High School Diploma, or a Commonwealth of Virginia Korean War Veteran Honorary High School Diploma, or a Commonwealth of Virginia Vietnam War Veteran Honorary High School Diploma. Such diplomas shall be delivered to eligible veterans during the first full week in September that has been designated, in accordance with §

2.2-3309.1

, as the Virginia World War II Veterans Appreciation Week, or during the first full week in November that has been designated, in accordance with §

2.2-3309.1

, as the Virginia Korean War Veterans Appreciation Week, or during the first full week in November that has been designated, in accordance with §

2.2-3310

, as Vietnam War Memorial Dedication Week and Veterans’ Recognition Week in the Commonwealth.

History.

2001, c. 263; 2002, c. 162; 2009, c. 66.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 162 added present subsection B; redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C; and, in subsection C, inserted “either” and added “or a Commonwealth of Virginia Korean War Veteran Honorary High School Diploma” in the second sentence, and added “or during the first full week in November that has been designated, in accordance with §

2.2-3309.1

, as the Virginia Korean War Veterans Appreciation Week” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 66 added “and was subsequently honorably discharged” at the end of A 1 and B 1; inserted subsection C; redesignated former subsection C as subsection D; and in subsection D, added “or a Commonwealth of Virginia Vietnam War Veteran Honorary High School Diploma” at the end of the next-to-last sentence and added the language beginning “or during the first full week” at the end of the last sentence.

§ 22.1-17.5.
Public notice and comment regarding certain resource guides.

In order to provide appropriate opportunity for input from the general public, parents, teachers, and local school boards, the Board of Education shall solicit public comment prior to revising or adopting Standards of Learning resource guides and lists of recommended textbooks in any Standards of Learning academic subject. Thirty days prior to soliciting public comment, the Board shall publish notice of its intended action. Interested parties shall be given reasonable opportunity to be heard and present information prior to final action of the Board.

The Board shall make such resource guides available for public inspection at least thirty days prior to final adoption or revision, as the case may be.

History.

2001, c. 869.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2001 act having been 22.1-17.4.

§ 22.1-17.6.
Public elementary and secondary schools and local school divisions; information and forms.

The Board shall adopt policies to ensure that the Department does not require public elementary or secondary schools or local school divisions to (i) provide information that is already available to or housed within the Department; (ii) provide the same written information more than once during a school year, absent a change in the underlying information; (iii) complete forms for students with disabilities unless such forms are necessary to ensure compliance with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. § 1431 et seq.); or (iv) provide information that is not necessary to comply with state or federal law unless such information is relevant to student outcomes or the efficient operation of the public schools, provided that the Department may require such schools and local school divisions to provide any such information or complete any such forms if the Department demonstrates a compelling need or demonstrates that it does not have a more expeditious method for obtaining the information or completing the forms.

The Department shall annually evaluate and determine the continued need for the information that it collects from public elementary and secondary schools and local school divisions. In making such evaluation and determination, the Department shall consider whether the information that it collects is required by state or federal law.

The Board shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by November 15 of each year on (i) information that public elementary and secondary schools and local school divisions are required to provide to the Department pursuant to state law, (ii) the results of the annual evaluation and determination made by the Department pursuant to subsection B, (iii) any reports required of public elementary or secondary schools or local school divisions that the Department has consolidated, (iv) any information that the Department no longer collects from public elementary or secondary schools or local school divisions, and (v) any forms that the Department no longer requires public elementary or secondary schools or local school divisions to complete.

History.

2016, c. 521; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “of Education” following “Department” throughout; deleted former subsection B, which read: “The Department of Education shall study the transition to electronic submission of all information and forms to the Department of Education by public elementary and secondary schools and local school divisions and submit a report of its findings to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than November 1, 2016”; substituted “subsection B” for “subsection C” in subsection C in clause (ii); and redesignated accordingly.

§ 22.1-17.7.
Social-emotional learning guidance standards.

The Department shall (i) establish a uniform definition of social-emotional learning and develop guidance standards for social-emotional learning for all public students in grades kindergarten through 12 in the Commonwealth; (ii) make such standards available to each local school division no later than July 1, 2021; and (iii) issue a report no later than November 1, 2021, on the resources needed to successfully support local school divisions with the implementation of a statewide social-emotional learning program.

History.

2020, c. 339.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 339 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-18.
Report on education and standards of quality for school divisions; when submitted and effective.

By December 1 of each year, the Board of Education shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report on the condition and needs of public education in the Commonwealth and shall identify any school divisions and the specific schools therein that have failed to establish and maintain schools meeting the existing prescribed standards of quality. Such standards of quality shall be subject to revision only by the General Assembly, pursuant to Article VIII, Section 2 of the Constitution of Virginia. Such report shall include:

A complete listing of the current standards of quality for the Commonwealth’s public schools, together with a justification for each particular standard, how long each such standard has been in its current form, and whether the Board recommends any change or addition to the standards of quality;

Information regarding parent and student choice within each school division and any plans of such school divisions to increase school choice;

A complete listing of each report that local school divisions are required to submit to the Board or any other state agency, including name, frequency, and an indication of whether the report contains information that the local school division is also required to submit to the federal government;

An explanation of the need to retain or maintain the frequency of any report identified pursuant to subdivision 3; any recommendation for the elimination, reduction in frequency, or consolidation of reports identified pursuant to subdivision 3 when such elimination, reduction in frequency, or consolidation would require an amendment to the laws of the Commonwealth; and a description of any other report identified pursuant to subdivision 3 that the Board has eliminated, reduced in frequency, or consolidated; and

A complete listing of each report pertaining to public education that local school divisions are required to submit to the federal government, including name and frequency.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-19.1; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 160; 1973, c. 97; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 157; 2002, cc. 159, 253; 2013, c. 643; 2015, c. 386; 2016, c. 469; 2017, c. 235.

Cross references.

For the standards for quality, see now § 22.1-253.13:1 et seq.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 159 and 253 are identical, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “In any year in which amendments to the standards of quality are proposed, such report shall further contain the standards of quality prescribed by the Board for the school divisions of the Commonwealth”; and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 643 added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 386 substituted “December 1” for “November 15” and “that” for “which” in the first sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 469 inserted the subdivision 1 and 2 designations; deleted “Such report shall also include” at the beginning of subdivision 2; and added subdivisions 3 and 4.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 235 inserted subdivision 4 and redesignated former subdivision 4 as subdivision 5.

§ 22.1-18.01.
Biennial review of the standards of quality required; budget estimates.

To ensure the integrity of the standards of quality, the Board of Education shall, in odd-numbered years, exercise its constitutional authority to determine and prescribe the standards, subject to revision only by the General Assembly, by reviewing the standards and either (i) proposing amendments to the standards or (ii) making a determination that no changes are necessary.

If the Board proposes changes to the standards of quality, the budget estimates that are required to be reported pursuant to §

2.2-1504

shall take into consideration the Board’s proposed standards of quality.

History.

2002, c. 498; 2006, cc. 42, 130; 2017, c. 787.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 138 B, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The Board of Education shall consider the caseload standards for speech-language pathologists as part of its review of the Standards of Quality, pursuant to § 22.1-18.01, Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 138 C, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “The Board of Education shall consider the inclusion of instructional positions needed for blind and visually impaired students enrolled in public schools and shall consider developing a caseload requirement for these instructional positions as part of its review of the Standards of Quality, pursuant to § 22.1-18.01, Code of Virginia.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 42 and 130 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “even-numbered years” for “odd-numbered years,” deleted former clause (i) preceding “reviewing the standards and,” and deleted the former clause (ii) designation thereafter, added present clause (i) designation, and redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (ii); and inserted “following the year” in subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 787, in subsection A, substituted “odd-numbered” for “even-numbered”; and in subsection B, substituted “If” for “In any odd-numbered year following the year in which.”

§ 22.1-18.1.
Annual report on gifted education required; local advisory committee on gifted education.

Each local school board shall submit the annual report, “Programs for Gifted Education,” as required by Board regulations, to the Department of Education.

Each school board may appoint, in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Education, a local advisory committee on gifted education. A local advisory committee on gifted education shall annually review the local plan for the education of gifted students, including revisions, and determine the extent to which the plan for the previous year was implemented. The comments and recommendations of the local advisory committee on gifted education shall be submitted in writing directly to the school board and the superintendent.

A school board shall comply with Board regulations governing gifted education relative to the use of multiple criteria for the identification of gifted students.

With such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose, the Department of Education shall conduct an annual review of all local gifted education programs, on such date as it may determine, to ensure full implementation and compliance with federal and state laws and regulations governing gifted education. The Department may conduct the review as an on-site observation or require certification of compliance from the division superintendent.

History.

1998, c. 879; 1999, c. 554; 2012, cc. 805, 836.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 871, cl. 1 provides: “As part of its current comprehensive review of its Regulations Governing Educational Services for Gifted Students (8VAC20-40-10 et seq.), the Board of Education shall consider revisions to the process of screening and identifying students for eligibility for gifted and talented programs and referring students to such programs to improve the identification of student populations that are underrepresented in such programs, including economically disadvantaged students, English language learner students, and students with disabilities. The Board of Education shall also consider revisions to the data collection requirements of the annual report required by such regulations to better inform equitable screening and identification for and access to gifted and talented programs for student populations that are underrepresented in such programs.”

The 1999 amendment,

in the first paragraph, deleted “The Board of Education shall require that” from the beginning of the paragraph, and inserted “shall” preceding “submit the”; in the second paragraph, added the first sentence, substituted “annually review” for “review annually,” and rewrote the former third sentence which read: “The recommendations of the advisory committee shall be submitted in writing through the division superintendent to the school board”; and substituted “comply” for “require compliance” in the third paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 805 and 836 are identical, and in the second paragraph, substituted “may appoint” for “shall appoint” in the first sentence, and substituted “A local advisory” for “The local advisory” in the second sentence.